Utah statutes.
32A-14a-101.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Death of a third person" includes recovery for all damages, special and
general, resulting from such death, except punitive damages.
(2) (a)  "Injury" includes injury in person, property, or means of support.
(b)  "Injury" also includes recovery for intangibles such as mental and
emotional injuries, loss of affection, and companionship.
